Maine, session 132, LD1135.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 6 MRSA §204, as amended by PL 2009, c. 447, §3, is further amended to
read:
§204. Implied consent to chemical tests
A person who operates or attempts to operate an aircraft within this State has a duty to
submit to chemical testing to determine that person's alcohol level and drug concentration
by analysis of blood, breath or, urine or oral fluid if there is probable cause to believe that
the person has operated or attempted to operate an aircraft while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs. The duty to submit to a chemical test includes the duty to
complete either a blood, breath or, urine or oral fluid test. Tests and procedures applicable
in determining whether a person is under the influence are governed by section 205.
Sec. 2. 6 MRSA §205, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §1, is further
amended to read:
5. Administration of tests. Persons conducting analyses of blood, breath or, urine or
oral fluid for the purpose of determining the alcohol level or drug concentration must be
certified for this purpose by the Department of Health and Human Services under
certification standards set by that department.
Only a duly licensed physician, licensed physician assistant, registered nurse or a person
certified by the Department of Health and Human Services under certification standards set
by that department, acting at the request of a law enforcement officer, may draw a specimen
of blood to determine the alcohol level or drug concentration of a person who is complying
with the duty to submit to a chemical test. This limitation does not apply to the taking of
breath specimens. When a person draws a specimen of blood at the request of a law
enforcement officer, that person may issue a certificate that states that the person is in fact
a duly licensed or certified person as required by this subsection and that the person
followed the proper procedure for drawing a specimen of blood to determine the alcohol
level or drug concentration. That certificate, when duly signed and sworn to by the person,
is admissible as evidence in any court of the State. It is prima facie evidence that the person
was duly licensed or certified and that the person followed the proper procedure for drawing
a specimen for chemical testing, unless, with 10 days' written notice to the prosecution, the
defendant requests that the person testify as to licensure or certification, or the procedure
for drawing the specimen of blood.
A law enforcement officer may take a sample specimen of the breath or, urine or oral fluid
of any person whom the officer has probable cause to believe operated or attempted to
operate an aircraft while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs and who is
complying with the duty to submit to and complete a chemical test. The sample specimen
must be submitted to the Department of Health and Human Services or a person certified
by the Department of Health and Human Services for the purpose of conducting chemical
tests of the sample specimen to determine the alcohol level or drug concentration of that
sample.
Only equipment approved by the Department of Health and Human Services may be used
by a law enforcement officer to take a sample specimen of the defendant's breath or, urine
or oral fluid for submission to the Department of Health and Human Services or a person
certified by the Department of Health and Human Services for the purpose of conducting
Page 1 - 132LR1721(01)

415 tests of the sample specimen to determine the alcohol level or drug concentration of that
426 sample. Approved equipment must have a stamp of approval affixed by the Department of
437 Health and Human Services. Evidence that the equipment was in a sealed carton bearing
448 the stamp of approval must be accepted in court as prima facie evidence that the equipment
459 was approved by the Department of Health and Human Services for use by the law
560 enforcement officer to take the sample specimen of the defendant's breath or, urine or oral
571 fluid.
As an alternative to the method of breath testing described in this subsection, a law
enforcement officer may test the breath of any person whom the officer has probable cause
to believe operated or attempted to operate an aircraft while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, by use of a self-contained, breath-alcohol testing apparatus to
determine the person's alcohol level, as long as the testing apparatus is reasonably available.
The procedures for the operation and testing of self-contained, breath-alcohol testing
apparatuses must be as provided by rule adopted by the Department of Health and Human
Services. The result of any such test must be accepted as prima facie evidence of the
alcohol level of a person in any court.
Approved self-contained, breath-alcohol testing apparatuses must have a stamp of approval
affixed by the Department of Health and Human Services after periodic testing. That stamp
of approval is valid for a limited period of no more than one year. Testimony or other
evidence that the equipment was bearing the stamp of approval must be accepted in court
as prima facie evidence that the equipment was approved by the Department of Health and
Human Services for use by the law enforcement officer to collect and analyze a sample
specimen of the defendant's breath.
Failure to comply with any provision of this subsection or with any rule adopted under this
subsection does not, by itself, result in the exclusion of evidence of alcohol level or drug
concentration, unless the evidence is determined to be not sufficiently reliable.
Testimony or other evidence that any materials used in operating or checking the operation
of the equipment were bearing a statement of the manufacturer or of the Department of
Health and Human Services must be accepted in court as prima facie evidence that the
materials were of a composition and quality as stated.
A person certified by the Maine Criminal Justice Academy, under certification standards
set by the academy, as qualified to operate approved self-contained, breath-alcohol testing
apparatuses may operate those apparatuses to collect and analyze a sample specimen of a
defendant's breath.
Sec. 3. 6 MRSA §205, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2009, c. 447, §4, is further
amended to read:
7. Evidence. The drug concentration in the defendant's blood or the defendant's
alcohol level at the time alleged, as shown by the chemical analysis of the defendant's
blood, breath or, urine or oral fluid or by results of a self-contained, breath-alcohol testing
apparatus authorized by subsection 5 is admissible in evidence.
When a person, certified under subsection 5, conducts a chemical analysis of blood or
breath to determine alcohol level, the person may issue a certificate stating the results of
the analysis. That certificate, when duly signed and sworn to by the certified person, is
admissible in evidence in any court of the State. It is prima facie evidence that the person
Page 2 - 132LR1721(01)

415 taking a specimen of blood or, urine or oral fluid was a person authorized by subsection 5;
426 that the equipment, chemicals and other materials used in the taking of the blood or, urine
437 or oral fluid specimen or a breath sample were of a quality appropriate for the purpose of
448 producing reliable test results; that any equipment, chemicals or materials required by
459 subsection 5 to be approved by the Department of Health and Human Services were in fact
560 approved; that the sample tested by the person certified under subsection 5 was in fact the
571 same sample taken from the defendant; and that the drug concentration in the defendant's
582 blood or the defendant's alcohol level was, at the time the blood or breath sample was taken,
593 as stated in the certificate, unless with 10 days' written notice to the prosecution, the
1504 defendant requests that a qualified witness testify as to any of the matters as to which the
1515 certificate constitutes prima facie evidence. The notice must specify those matters
1526 concerning which the defendant requests testimony.
A person certified under subsection 5 as qualified to operate a self-contained, breath-
alcohol testing apparatus to determine the alcohol level may issue a certificate stating the
results of the analysis. That certificate, when duly signed and sworn to by the certified
person, is admissible in evidence in any court of the State. It is prima facie evidence that
the defendant's alcohol level was, at the time the breath sample was taken, as stated in the
certificate, unless, with 10 days' written notice to the prosecution, the defendant requests
that the operator or other qualified witness testify as to the results of the analysis.
Transfer of sample specimens to and from a laboratory for purposes of analysis is by
certified or registered mail and, when so made, is deemed to comply with all requirements
regarding the continuity of custody of physical evidence.
The failure of a person to comply with the duty to submit to and complete a chemical test
under section 204 is admissible in evidence on the issue of whether that person was under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs. If the law enforcement officer having
probable cause to believe that the person operated or attempted to operate an aircraft while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs fails to give either of the warnings
required under subsection 2, the failure of the person to comply with the duty to submit to
a chemical test is not admissible, except when a test was required pursuant to subsection
11. If a failure to submit to and complete a chemical test is not admitted into evidence, the
court may inform the jury of the fact that no test result is available.
If a test result is not available for a reason other than failing to comply with the duty to
submit to and complete a chemical test, the unavailability and the reason are admissible in
evidence.
Sec. 4. 6 MRSA §205, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2009, c. 447, §4, is further
amended to read:
11. Fatalities. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an operator of an
aircraft who is involved in an aircraft accident that results in the death of a person must
submit to and complete a chemical test to determine that person's alcohol level or drug
concentration by analysis of blood, breath or, urine or oral fluid. A law enforcement officer
may determine which type of test will be administered. The result of a test taken pursuant
to this subsection is not admissible at trial unless the court is satisfied that probable cause
exists, independent of the test result, to believe that the operator was under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs or had an excessive alcohol level.
Page 3 - 132LR1721(01)

Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §10702, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2009, c. 447, §9, is further
amended to read:
1. Duty to submit. A person who hunts wild animals or wild birds or operates or
attempts to operate a watercraft, snowmobile or ATV within this State has a duty to submit
to a test to determine that person's alcohol level or drug concentration by analysis of blood,
breath or, urine or oral fluid if there is probable cause to believe that the person is hunting
wild animals or wild birds or operating or attempting to operate a watercraft, snowmobile
or ATV while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs. The duty to submit to an
alcohol level or drug concentration test includes the duty to complete either a blood, breath
or, urine or oral fluid test or any combination of those tests. Tests and procedures for
determining whether a person is under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs are
governed by section 10703.
Sec. 6. 12 MRSA §10703, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §2, is
further amended to read:
5. Administration of tests. Persons conducting analyses of blood, breath or, urine or
oral fluid for the purpose of determining an alcohol level or drug concentration must be
certified for each purpose by the Department of Health and Human Services under
certification standards set by that department.
A. Only a physician, licensed physician assistant, registered nurse or person whose
occupational license or training allows that person to draw blood samples may draw a
specimen of blood for the purpose of determining the blood-alcohol level or the
presence of a drug or drug metabolite. This limitation does not apply to the taking of
breath or urine specimens. When a person draws a specimen of blood at the request of
a law enforcement officer, that person may issue a certificate that states that the person
is in fact a duly licensed or certified person as required by this subsection and that the
person followed the proper procedure for drawing a specimen of blood to determine an
alcohol level or drug concentration. That certificate, when duly signed and sworn to
by the person, is admissible as evidence in any court of the State. It is prima facie
evidence that the person was duly licensed or certified and that the person followed the
proper procedure for drawing a specimen of blood for chemical testing, unless, with 10
days' written notice to the prosecution, the defendant requests that the person testify as
to licensure or certification, or the procedure for drawing the specimen of blood.
B. A law enforcement officer may take a sample specimen of the breath or, urine or
oral fluid of any person whom the officer has probable cause to believe hunted wild
animals or wild birds or operated or attempted to operate a watercraft, snowmobile or
ATV while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs and who is complying
with the duty to submit to and complete a chemical test. The sample specimen must
be submitted to the Department of Health and Human Services or a person certified by
the Department of Health and Human Services for the purpose of conducting chemical
tests of the sample specimen to determine an alcohol level or drug concentration of that
sample.
C. Only equipment approved by the Department of Health and Human Services may
be used by a law enforcement officer to take a sample specimen of the defendant's
breath or, urine or oral fluid for submission to the Department of Health and Human
Services or a person certified by the Department of Health and Human Services for the
Page 4 - 132LR1721(01)

416 purpose of conducting tests of the sample specimen to determine an alcohol level or
427 drug concentration of that sample. Approved equipment must have a stamp of approval
438 affixed by the Department of Health and Human Services. Evidence that the equipment
449 was in a sealed carton bearing the stamp of approval must be accepted in court as prima
550 facie evidence that the equipment was approved by the Department of Health and
561 Human Services for use by the law enforcement officer to take the sample specimen of
572 the defendant's breath or, urine or oral fluid.
D. As an alternative to the method of breath testing described in this subsection, a law
enforcement officer may test the breath of any person whom the officer has probable
cause to believe hunted wild birds or wild animals or operated or attempted to operate
a watercraft, snowmobile or ATV while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, by
use of a self-contained, breath-alcohol testing apparatus to determine an alcohol level,
as long as the testing apparatus is reasonably available. The procedures for the
operation and testing of self-contained, breath-alcohol testing apparatuses must be as
provided by rule adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services. The result
of any such test must be accepted as prima facie evidence of an alcohol level in any
court.
E. Approved self-contained, breath-alcohol testing apparatuses must have a stamp of
approval affixed by the Department of Health and Human Services after periodic
testing. That stamp of approval is valid for a limited period of no more than one year.
Testimony or other evidence that the equipment was bearing the stamp of approval
must be accepted in court as prima facie evidence that the equipment was approved by
the Department of Health and Human Services for use by the law enforcement officer
to collect and analyze a sample specimen of the defendant's breath.
F. Failure to comply with any provision of this subsection or with any rule adopted
under this subsection does not, by itself, result in the exclusion of evidence of an
alcohol level or drug concentration, unless the evidence is determined to be not
sufficiently reliable.
G. Testimony or other evidence that any materials used in operating or checking the
operation of the equipment were bearing a statement of the manufacturer or of the
Department of Health and Human Services must be accepted in court as prima facie
evidence that the materials were of a composition and quality as stated.
H. A person certified by the Maine Criminal Justice Academy, under certification
standards set by the academy, as qualified to operate approved self-contained, breath-
alcohol testing apparatuses may operate those apparatuses to collect and analyze a
sample specimen of a defendant's breath.
Sec. 7. 12 MRSA §10703, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2023, c. 228, §4, is further
amended to read:
7. Evidence. The defendant's alcohol level at the time alleged and the concentration
of drugs at the time alleged, as shown by the chemical analysis of the defendant's blood,
breath or, urine or oral fluid or by any test authorized by subsection 5 is admissible in
evidence.
A. When a person certified under subsection 5 conducts a chemical analysis of blood,
breath or, urine or oral fluid to determine an alcohol level or drug concentration, the
Page 5 - 132LR1721(01)

415 person conducting the analysis may issue a certificate stating the results of the analysis.
426 That certificate, when duly signed and sworn to by the certified person, is admissible
437 in evidence in any court of the State. It is prima facie evidence that the person taking
448 a specimen of blood or, urine or oral fluid was a person authorized by subsection 5;
459 that the equipment, chemicals and other materials used in the taking of the blood or,
560 urine or oral fluid specimen or a breath sample were of a quality appropriate for the
571 purpose of producing reliable test results; that any equipment, chemicals or materials
582 required by subsection 5 to be approved by the Department of Health and Human
593 Services were in fact approved; that the sample tested by the person certified under
1504 subsection 5 was in fact the same sample taken from the defendant; and that the drug
1515 concentration in the defendant's blood or the defendant's alcohol level was, at the time
1526 the blood, breath or, urine or oral fluid sample was taken, as stated in the certificate,
1537 unless with 10 days' written notice to the prosecution, the defendant requests that a
1548 qualified witness testify as to any of the matters as to which the certificate constitutes
1559 prima facie evidence. The notice must specify those matters concerning which the
1660 defendant requests testimony.
B. A person certified under subsection 5 as qualified to operate a self-contained,
breath-alcohol testing apparatus to determine an alcohol level may issue a certificate
stating the results of the analysis. That certificate, when duly signed and sworn to by
the certified person, is admissible in evidence in any court of the State. It is prima facie
evidence that the defendant's alcohol level was, at the time the breath sample was taken,
as stated in the certificate, unless, with 10 days' written notice to the prosecution, the
defendant requests that the operator or other qualified witness testify as to the results
of the analysis.
C. Transfer of sample specimens to and from a laboratory for purposes of analysis
must be by certified or registered mail and, when so made, is deemed to comply with
all requirements regarding the continuity of custody of physical evidence.
D. The failure of a person to comply with the duty to submit to and complete a
chemical test under section 10702, subsection 1 is admissible in evidence on the issue
of whether that person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs. If the
law enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that the person hunted wild
animals or wild birds or operated or attempted to operate a watercraft, snowmobile or
ATV while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs fails to give either of the
warnings required under subsection 2, the failure of the person to comply with the duty
to submit to a chemical test is not admissible. If a failure to submit to and complete a
chemical test is not admitted into evidence, the court may inform the jury of the fact
that a test result is not available.
E. If a test result is not available for a reason other than a person's failure to comply
with the duty to submit to and complete a chemical test, the unavailability and the
reason are admissible in evidence.
Sec. 8. 16 MRSA §357, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 335, §1, is further
amended to read:
Notwithstanding this section, the result of a laboratory or any other test kept by a
hospital or other medical facility that reflects an alcohol level, a detectable urine-drug level,
a detectable blood-drug level, a detectable oral fluid-drug level or a drug concentration of
Page 6 - 132LR1721(01)

416 either blood or, urine or oral fluid may not be excluded as evidence in a criminal or civil
427 proceeding by reason of any claim of confidentiality or privilege and may be admitted as
438 long as the result is relevant and reliable evidence if the proceeding is one in which the
449 operator of a motor vehicle, snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle or watercraft is alleged to have
550 operated under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs and the court is satisfied that
561 probable cause exists to believe that the operator committed the offense charged.
Sec. 9. 29-A MRSA §2401, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2013, c. 459, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Chemical test or test. "Chemical test" or "test" means a test or tests used to
determine alcohol level or the presence of a drug or drug metabolite by analysis of blood,
breath or, urine or oral fluid.
Sec. 10. 29-A MRSA §2431, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 335, §3, is further
amended to read:
1. Test results. Test results showing a confirmed positive drug or metabolite presence
in blood or, urine or oral fluid or alcohol level at the time alleged are admissible in evidence.
Failure to comply with the provisions of sections 2521 and 2523 may not, by itself, result
in the exclusion of evidence of alcohol level or confirmed positive drug or metabolite
presence, unless the evidence is determined to be not sufficiently reliable.
Sec. 11. 29-A MRSA §2431, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 204, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Analysis of blood, breath and, urine and oral fluid. The following provisions
apply to the analysis of blood, breath and, urine and oral fluid, and the use of that analysis
as evidence.
A. A laboratory certified or licensed in accordance with section 2524 conducting a
chemical analysis of blood, breath or, urine or oral fluid to determine an alcohol level
or the presence of a drug or drug metabolite may issue a certificate stating the results
of the analysis.
B. A person qualified to operate a self-contained, breath-alcohol testing apparatus may
issue a certificate stating the results of an analysis of a test that the person administered.
C. A certificate issued in accordance with paragraph A or B, when duly signed and
sworn, is prima facie evidence that:
(2) Materials used in the taking of the specimen were of a quality appropriate for
the purpose of producing reliable test results;
(3) Materials required to be approved by the Department of Health and Human
Services were in fact approved;
(4) The sample tested was in fact the same sample taken from the defendant; and
(5) The alcohol level or the presence of a drug or drug metabolite in the blood or,
urine or oral fluid of the defendant at the time the sample was taken was as stated
in the certificate.
D. With 10 days written notice to the prosecution, the defendant may request that a
qualified witness testify to the matters of which the certificate constitutes prima facie
Page 7 - 132LR1721(01)

412 evidence. The notice must specify those matters concerning which the defendant
423 requests testimony. The certificate is not prima facie evidence of those matters.
E. A person drawing a specimen of blood may issue a certificate that states that the
person is in fact qualified under section 2524 and that the proper procedure for drawing
a specimen of blood was followed. That certificate, when signed and sworn to by the
person, is prima facie evidence of its contents unless, with 10 days' written notice to
the prosecution, the defendant requests that the person testify.
F. Evidence that the urine sample was in a sealed carton bearing the Department of
Health and Human Services' stamp of approval is prima facie evidence that the
equipment was approved by the Department of Health and Human Services.
G. The results of a self-contained breath-alcohol apparatus test is prima facie evidence
of an alcohol level.
H. Evidence that the self-contained breath-alcohol testing equipment bearing the
Department of Health and Human Services' stamp of approval is prima facie evidence
that the equipment was approved by the Department of Health and Human Services.
I. Evidence that materials used in operating or checking the operation of the self-
contained breath-alcohol testing equipment bore a statement of the manufacturer or of
the Department of Health and Human Services is prima facie evidence that the
materials were of the composition and quality stated.
J. Transfer of sample specimens to and from a laboratory for purposes of analysis by
certified or registered mail complies with all requirements regarding the continuity of
custody of physical evidence.
K. The prosecution is not required to produce expert testimony regarding the
functioning of self-contained breath-alcohol testing apparatus before test results are
admissible, if sufficient evidence is offered to satisfy paragraphs H and I.
Sec. 12. 29-A MRSA §2432, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2013, c. 459, §4, is further
amended to read:
4. Confirmed presence of drug or drug metabolite. If a person has a trace amount
of any drug or the metabolites of any drug within the person's blood or, urine or oral fluid
in accordance with the drug reporting rules, standards, procedures and protocols adopted
by the Department of Health and Human Services, it is admissible evidence, but not prima
facie, indicating whether that person is under the influence of intoxicants to be considered
with other competent evidence, including evidence of alcohol level.
Sec. 13. 29-A MRSA §2453-A, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 335, §5, is
amended to read:
3. Drug test. The person who analyzed the drug or its metabolite in the blood or, urine
or oral fluid of the person who is the subject of the drug recognition expert's report under
subsection 2 shall send a copy of a confirmed positive test result certificate to the Secretary
of State.
Sec. 14. 29-A MRSA §2453-A, sub-§7, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 335, §5, is
amended to read:
Page 8 - 132LR1721(01)

A. The person operated a motor vehicle with a confirmed positive blood or, urine or
oral fluid test for a drug or its metabolite;
Sec. 15. 29-A MRSA §2472, sub-§5, ¶B, as amended by PL 2011, c. 335, §8, is
further amended to read:
B. The person operated a motor vehicle with an alcohol level of more than 0.00 grams
per 100 milliliters of blood or 210 liters of breath or with a confirmed positive blood
or, urine or oral fluid test for a drug or its metabolite and was under the influence of
the confirmed drug; and
Sec. 16. 29-A MRSA §2521, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 459, §7, is further
amended to read:
1. Mandatory submission to test. If there is probable cause to believe a person has
operated a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicants, that person shall submit
to and complete a test to determine an alcohol level and the presence of a drug or drug
metabolite by analysis of blood, breath or, urine or oral fluid.
Sec. 17. 29-A MRSA §2524, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 368, §4, is further
amended to read:
4. Chemical tests on blood and, urine and oral fluid specimens. A sample specimen
of blood or, urine or oral fluid may be submitted to the Department of Health and Human
Services or to a laboratory qualified pursuant to subsection 2 for the purpose of conducting
chemical tests to determine alcohol level or the presence of a drug or drug metabolite.
Sec. 18. 29-A MRSA §2524, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2019, c. 368, §5, is further
amended to read:
5. Equipment for taking specimens. For purposes of this section, collection kits
having a stamp of approval affixed by the Department of Health and Human Services may
be used to take a sample specimen of blood or, urine or oral fluid. A sample specimen of
blood or, urine or oral fluid may also be taken in any collection tube of the type normally
used in a laboratory qualified pursuant to subsection 2. The fact that a laboratory qualified
pursuant to subsection 2 supplied the collection tube is prima facie evidence that the
collection tube is the type of tube normally used in such a laboratory. Alternatively, a self-
contained, breath-alcohol testing apparatus if reasonably available may be used to
determine the alcohol level.
Approved breath-alcohol testing apparatus must have a stamp of approval affixed by the
Department of Health and Human Services after periodic testing. That stamp is valid for
no more than one year.
Sec. 19. 29-A MRSA §2525, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 335, §14, is
further amended to read:
1. Submission to test required. If a drug recognition expert has probable cause to
believe that a person is under the influence of a specific category of drug, a combination of
specific categories of drugs or a combination of alcohol and one or more specific categories
of drugs, that person must submit to a blood or, urine or oral fluid test selected by the drug
recognition expert to confirm that person's category of drug use and determine the presence
of the drug.
Page 9 - 132LR1721(01)